Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 3. Members.

§79-29-301.
Admission of members.

A person becomes a member on the later of:

The formation of the limited liability company; or

The date stated in the records of the limited liability company as the date that person becomes a member.

After the formation of the limited liability company, a person is admitted as a member of the limited liability company:

In the case of a person who is not an assignee of a financial interest, including a person acquiring an interest directly from the limited liability company and a person to be admitted as a member of the limited liability company without acquiring a financial interest in the limited liability company at the time provided in and upon the compliance with the certificate of formation or the operating agreement or, if the certificate of formation or the operating agreement does not so provide, upon the written consent of all members.If the parties do not specify an agreed admission date in writing, the admission shall be deemed to have occurred upon the date of the compliance with the conditions set forth in this subsection; and

In the case of an assignee of a financial interest, upon compliance with subsection (1) of Section 79-29-707.If the parties do not specify an agreed admission date in writing the admission shall be deemed to have occurred upon the date of the compliance with the conditions set forth in subsection (1) of Section 79-29-707.

In the case of a person being admitted as a member of a surviving limited liability company pursuant to a merger approved in accordance with Section 79-29-223 of this chapter, as provided in the operating agreement of the surviving limited liability company or in the agreement of merger, and in the event of any inconsistency, the terms of the agreement of merger shall control; and in the case of a person being admitted as a member of a limited liability company pursuant to a merger in which such limited liability company is not the surviving limited liability company in the merger, as provided in the operating agreement of such limited liability company.

In the case of a person who inherits an interest in a limited liability company from a deceased member, upon the distribution of the interest from the estate of the deceased member to the person.

In the case of a person who is the successor of a member that is an entity which has merged, upon the merger of the member.

A person may be admitted to a limited liability company as a member of the limited liability company and may receive an interest in the limited liability company without making a contribution or being obligated to make a contribution to the limited liability company.

A person may be admitted to a limited liability company as a member of the limited liability company without acquiring an interest in the limited liability company.

A person may be admitted as the sole member of a limited liability company without making a contribution or being obligated to make a contribution to the limited liability company or without acquiring an interest in the limited liability company.

A certificate of formation or written operating agreement may provide that a member or members shall have preemptive rights to subscribe to any additional issue of interests in a limited liability company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-301 [ Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 22;
Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 1997; Repealed by
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to admission of a member. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

“Member” as meaning a person that has been admitted to a limited liability company as provided in this section see § 79-29-103.

Real property buyer was not a member of a limited liability company (LLC) because, under the unambiguous terms of an operating agreement, a $500,000 contribution was required to become a member; under former version of Miss. Code Ann. § 79-29-301, the LLC agreement did not have to be in force at the time of filing a certificate of formation. Moreover, all potential members of the LLC did not have to be accounted for at the time of the certificate’s filing. Kilpatrick v. White Hall on MS River, LLC, 207 So.3d 1241, 2016 Miss. LEXIS 83 (Miss. 2016).

§79-29-302.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-302. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-302 was entitled: Management of limited liability company. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-305.

§79-29-303.
Withdrawal of member and expulsion of member.

A member may withdraw from a limited liability company only at the time or upon the happening of events specified in a written operating agreement and in accordance with the written operating agreement or upon the written consent of all the members.Notwithstanding anything to the contrary under applicable law, unless the certificate of formation or a written operating agreement provides otherwise, a member may not withdraw from a limited liability company prior to the dissolution and winding-up of the limited liability company without the written consent of all of the members of the limited liability company.Unless otherwise provided by the certificate of formation or written operating agreement, a limited liability company has no power to expel a member. Except as otherwise provided by the certificate of formation or written operating agreement, a member who has withdrawn from or been expelled from a limited liability company ceases to be a member of the limited liability company and ceases to have any governance rights.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former
§ 79-29-303 [ Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to agency power of members and managers. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-29-307.

Members 3 and 4 could not expel members 1 and 2 (M1 and M2) under a limited liability company’s (LLC) operating agreement for their alleged fraud, bad acts, or abandonment of their management duties, and as M1 and M2’s membership had not been withdrawn under this section, M1 and M2 were still members of the LLC. In re Mid-South Bus. Assocs., LLC, 555 B.R. 565, 2016 Bankr. LEXIS 3383 (Bankr. N.D. Miss. 2016).

Chancery court properly granted motions for summary judgment and declaratory judgment filed by a law firm and its individual members in a former member’s action for interpretation of the firm’s partnership agreements and related documents because, although the former member’s withdrawal from the firm severed his statutory governance rights, he continued to have governance rights as outlined in and permitted by the dispute-resolution provision of the supplement agreement, including his participation in a majority vote on “any dispute or decision related to this agreement,” and he was bound by the terms of the dispute-resolution provision and the resulting joint resolution. Sledge v. Grenfell Sledge & Stevens, PLLC, 263 So.3d 655, 2018 Miss. LEXIS 504 (Miss. 2018).

§79-29-304.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-304. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-304 was entitled: Classes and voting. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-309.

§79-29-305.
Management of limited liability company.

The management of a limited liability company shall be vested in its members in proportion to the then current percentage or other interest of members in the profits of the limited liability company owned by all of the members, the decision of members owning more than fifty percent (50%) of the said percentage or other interest in the profits controlling; provided however, that if an operating agreement provides for the management, in whole or in part, of a limited liability company by a manager or managers, the management of the limited liability company, to the extent so provided, shall be vested in the manager or managers who shall be chosen in the manner provided in the operating agreement.

A member of a member-managed limited liability company has the power and authority to delegate to one or more other persons the member’s rights and powers to manage and control the business and affairs of the limited liability company, including to delegate to agents, officers and employees of a member or the limited liability company and to delegate by agreement to other persons.The delegation shall not cause the member to cease to be a member of the limited liability company or cause the person to whom any such rights and powers have been delegated to be a member or manager, as the case may be, of the limited liability company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-305 [ Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to liability of third parties. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-311.

Absent a written agreement to the contrary, one member of a limited liability company (LLC) was not liable to other members for the loss of their investment under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-29-305(1). Likewise, neither party in the case had any enforceable obligation to contribute any money or property to the limited liability company under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-29-502(1) [Repealed] since the investor admitted that there was no written operating agreement for either LLC, nor was there any other written agreement that was signed by the investor and the restaurateur obligating them to contribute money or property to the LLCs. Harrell v. St. John, 792 F. Supp. 2d 933, 2011 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 58058 (S.D. Miss. 2011).

Improperly ousted member of two limited liability companies (LLCs) was entitled pursuant to Miss. Code Ann. § 79-29-306 (Rev. 2009) to collect the fair-market value of the member’s interest in the LLCs from the companies and three individual members where the three individual members acted in a willful and grossly negligent manner by improperly squeezing the ousted member out of the companies. Bluewater Logistics, LLC v. Williford, 55 So.3d 148, 2011 Miss. LEXIS 64 (Miss. 2011).

Where one member of a Mississippi professional limited liability company (PLLC) filed a voluntary Chapter 7 case for the PLLC under 11 U.S.C.S. § 301, but the other member did not consent under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-29-304(2) (2009) [Repealed], and the PLLC documents did not authorize on member to file under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-29-302 (2009), the case was dismissed. In re Wyatt & McAlister, PLLC, 2010 Bankr. LEXIS 1413 (Bankr. S.D. Miss. Apr. 23, 2010).

Construction and Application of Limited Liability Company Acts – Issues Relating to Liability of Limited Liability Company for Acts of Its Members, Managers, Officers, and Agents.
47 A.L.R.6th 1.

Construction and Application of Limited Liability Company Acts – Issues Relating to Personal Liability of Individual Members and Managers of Limited Liability Company as to Third Parties.
46 A.L.R.6th 1.

§79-29-306.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-306. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-306 was entitled: Limited liability company agreement.

§79-29-307.
Agency power of members, managers and officers.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, every member is an agent of the limited liability company for the purpose of conducting its business and affairs, and the act of any member, including, but not limited to, the execution in the name of the limited liability company of any instrument for apparently carrying on in the ordinary course the business or affairs of the limited liability company of which the person is a member, binds the limited liability company, unless the member so acting has, in fact, no authority to act for the limited liability company in the particular matter and the person with whom the member is dealing has knowledge of the fact that the member has no such authority.

If the certificate of formation or operating agreement provides that management of the limited liability company is vested in a manager or managers then except as otherwise provided in the certificate of formation or the operating agreement:

No member, acting solely in the capacity as a member, is an agent of the limited liability company; and

Every manager is an agent of the limited liability company for the purpose of its business and affairs, and the act of any manager, including, but not limited to, the execution in the name of the limited liability company of any instrument for apparently carrying on in the ordinary course the business or affairs of the limited liability company of which the person is the manager, binds the limited liability company, unless the manager so acting has, in fact, no authority to act for the limited liability company in the particular matter and the person with whom the manager is dealing has knowledge of the fact that the manager has no such authority.

Every officer is an agent of the limited liability company for the purpose of its business and affairs to the extent the agency authority has been delegated to the officer as provided by the operating agreement, and the act of any officer, including, but not limited to, the execution in the name of the limited liability company of any instrument for apparently carrying on in the ordinary course the business or affairs of the limited liability company of which the person is an officer, binds the limited liability company, unless the officer so acting has, in fact, no authority to act for the limited liability company in the particular matter and the person with whom the officer is dealing has knowledge of the fact that the officer has no such authority.

No act of a manager, member or officer in contravention of a restriction on authority shall bind the limited liability company to persons having knowledge of the restriction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-307 [ Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to events of dissociation of members. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

“Event of dissociation” as meaning an event that causes a person to cease to be a member as provided in this section, see § 79-29-103.

Dissolution of a limited liability company upon an event of dissociation of a member as provided in this section, see § 79-29-801.

Where a minority member of a limited liability company (LLC), without the consent of the majority member, transferred LLC property to a company of which the member was the sole owner, the transfer, and subsequent pledge of the property to a creditor, were null and void because the member lacked the authority under the LLC’s operating agreement and Miss. Code Ann. § 79-29-303. Kinwood Capital Group. LLC v. Northlake Dev., LLC (In re Northlake Dev., LLC), 2007 Bankr. LEXIS 4403 (Bankr. S.D. Miss. Dec. 13, 2007), amended, in part, 2008 Bankr. LEXIS 870 (Bankr. S.D. Miss. Mar. 20, 2008).

§79-29-308.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-308. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-308 related to a member’s right to inspect, copy and obtain certain limited liability company records. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-315.

§79-29-309.
Voting, classes and meetings.

With respect to any matter to be voted on, consented to or approved by the members, or any action required or permitted to be taken by the members the vote of each member shall be based on the then current percentage held by such member in the profits of the limited liability company owned by all the members.

Unless a greater percentage is expressly required by another section of this chapter, with respect to any matter to be voted on, consented to or approved by the members or any action required or permitted to be taken by the members, the decision of members of a limited liability company owning more than fifty percent (50%) of the said percentage in the profits as described in subsection (1) of this section is controlling.

A certificate of formation or operating agreement may provide for classes or groups of members having such relative rights, powers and duties as may be provided therein, and may make provision for the future creation in the manner provided therein of additional classes or groups of members having such relative rights, powers and duties as may from time to time be established, including rights, powers and duties senior to existing classes and groups of members.A certificate of formation or written operating agreement may provide that any member or class or group of members shall have no voting rights.

The certificate of formation or operating agreement may grant to all or certain identified members or a specified class or group of the members the right to vote (on any basis) separately or with all or any class or group of the members, on any matter.

A certificate of formation or operating agreement may set forth provisions relating to notice of the time, place or purpose of any meeting at which any matter is to be voted on by any members, waiver of any such notice, action by consent without a meeting, the establishment of a record date, quorum requirements, voting in person or by proxy, or any other matter with respect to the exercise of any such right to vote.

Meetings of members may be held by means of telephone or other communications equipment by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can speak to and hear each other, and participation in a meeting pursuant to this subsection shall constitute presence in person at the meeting;

On any matter that is to be voted on, consented to or approved by members, or any action required or permitted to be taken by the members the members may take such action without a meeting, without prior notice and without a vote if a consent or consents in writing, setting forth the action so taken, shall be signed by the members owning at least the percent of the interests which would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all members entitled to vote thereon were present and voted.If any action of the members is proposed to be taken pursuant to this subsection without the written consent of all of the members, the members who did not sign the written consent shall be provided with notice of the executed consent within twenty (20) days of the execution of the written consent.The execution of a written consent by any member shall constitute a waiver by such member of notice thereof.

On any matter that is to be voted on by members, the members may vote in person or by proxy, and the proxy may be granted in writing, by means of electronic transmission or as otherwise permitted by applicable law.

If a meeting of members has not been held during the immediately preceding fifteen (15) months, a member or members owning twenty percent (20%) or more of the voting power of all members entitled to vote may call a regular meeting of members by giving thirty (30) days’ written notice to the members, all at the expense of the limited liability company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

Where one member of a Mississippi professional limited liability company (PLLC) filed a voluntary Chapter 7 case for the PLLC under 11 U.S.C.S. § 301, but the other member did not consent under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-29-304(2) (2009), and the PLLC documents did not authorize on member to file under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-29-302 (2009), the case was dismissed. In re Wyatt & McAlister, PLLC, 2010 Bankr. LEXIS 1413 (Bankr. S.D. Miss. Apr. 23, 2010).

§79-29-311.
Liability to third parties.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, the debts, obligations and liabilities of a limited liability company, whether arising in contract, tort or otherwise, shall be solely the debts, obligations and liabilities of the limited liability company, and no member, manager or officer of a limited liability company shall be obligated personally for any such debt, obligation or liability of the limited liability company solely by reason of being a member, acting as a manager or acting as an officer of the limited liability company.

A member, manager or officer of a limited liability company is not a proper party to a proceeding by or against a limited liability company, by reason of being a member, manager or officer, as applicable, of the limited liability company, except:

Where the object of the proceeding is to enforce a member’s, manager’s or officer’s right against or liability to the limited liability company; or

In a derivative action brought pursuant to Article 11 of this chapter.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, under an operating agreement or under another agreement, a member, manager or officer may agree to be obligated personally for any or all of the debts, obligations and liabilities of the limited liability company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-313.
Events of bankruptcy.

The certificate of formation or the written operating agreement may provide for events the occurrence of which result in a member either (a) ceasing to have some or all governance rights; (b) ceasing to have some or all financial rights; or (c) ceasing to be a member.

A person who has ceased to be a member shall continue to have any financial rights that the person had at the time of the event but shall cease to have any governance rights or any other rights.

Unless otherwise provided in the certificate of formation or written operating agreement or with the written consent of all members, a member ceases to be a member upon the happening of the following events:

A member:(i) makes an assignment for the benefit of creditors; (ii) files a voluntary petition in bankruptcy; (iii) is adjudicated a bankrupt or insolvent; (iv) files a petition or answer seeking for the person any reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution, or similar relief under any statute, law or regulation; (v) files an answer or other pleading admitting or failing to contest the material allegations of a petition filed against the member in any proceeding of the nature described in this subsection (3)(a); or (vi) seeks, consents to or acquiesces in the appointment of a trustee, receiver or liquidator of the member or of all or any substantial part of the member’s properties; or

If one hundred twenty (120) days after the commencement of any proceeding against the member seeking reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution, or similar relief under any statute, law or regulation, the proceeding has not been dismissed, or if within ninety (90) days after the appointment without the member’s consent or acquiescence of a trustee, receiver or liquidator of the member or of all or any substantial part of the member’s properties, the appointment is not vacated or stayed or within ninety (90) days after the expiration of any stay, the appointment is not vacated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-315.
Access to and confidentiality of information; records.

Each member of a limited liability company has the right, subject to such reasonable standards, including standards governing what information and documents are to be furnished at what time and location and at whose expense, as may be set forth in an operating agreement or otherwise established by the manager or, if there is no manager, then by the members, to obtain from the limited liability company from time to time upon reasonable demand for any good faith purpose reasonably related to the member’s interest as a member of the limited liability company:

True, full and current information regarding the status of the business and financial condition of the limited liability company;

Promptly after becoming available, a copy of the limited liability company’s federal, state and local income tax returns for each year;

A current list of the name and last known business, residence or mailing address of each member and manager;

A copy of any written operating agreement and certificate of formation and all amendments thereto, together with executed copies of any written powers of attorney pursuant to which the operating agreement and any certificate and all amendments thereto have been executed;

True and full information regarding the amount of cash and a description and statement of the agreed value of any other property or services contributed by each member and which each member has agreed to contribute in the future, and the date on which each became a member; and

Other information regarding the affairs of the limited liability company as is just and reasonable.

Each manager shall have the right to examine all of the information described in subsection (1) of this section for a good faith purpose reasonably related to the position of manager.

The manager or members of a limited liability company, referred to herein as the “authority,” shall have the right to keep confidential from the members and managers, for a period of time as the authority deems reasonable, any information which the authority reasonably believes to be in the nature of trade secrets or other information the disclosure of which the authority in good faith believes is not in the best interest of the limited liability company or could damage the limited liability company or its business or which the limited liability company is required by law or by agreement with a third party to keep confidential.

A limited liability company may maintain its records in other than a written form if such form is capable of conversion into written form within a reasonable time.

Any demand under this section shall be in writing and shall state the purpose of such demand with reasonable detail.

Any action to enforce any right arising under this section shall be brought in the chancery court of the county where the limited liability company’s principal office is located.If the limited liability company refuses to permit a member to obtain or a manager to examine the information described in subsection (1) of this section or does not reply to the demand that has been made within five (5) business days after the demand has been made, the demanding member or manager may apply to the chancery court for an order to compel the disclosure.The chancery court is hereby vested with exclusive jurisdiction to determine whether the person seeking the information is entitled to the information sought.The court may summarily order the limited liability company to permit the demanding member to obtain or manager to examine the information described in subsection (1) of this section and to make copies or abstracts therefrom, or the court may summarily order the limited liability company to furnish to the demanding member or manager the information described in subsection (1) of this section on the condition that the demanding member or manager first pay to the limited liability company the reasonable cost of obtaining and furnishing the information and on such other conditions as the court of chancery deems appropriate.When a demanding member seeks to obtain or a manager seeks to examine the information described in subsection (1) of this section, the demanding member or manager shall first establish (a) that the demanding member or manager has complied with the provisions of this section respecting the form and manner of making demand for obtaining or examining of the information, and (b) that the information the demanding member or manager seeks is reasonably related to the member’s interest as a member or the manager’s position as a manager, as the case may be.The court may, in its discretion, prescribe any limitations or conditions with reference to the obtaining or examining of information, or award such other or further relief as the chancery court may deem just and proper.The court may order books, documents and records, pertinent extracts therefrom, or duly authenticated copies thereof, to be brought within the state and kept in the state upon such terms and conditions as the order may prescribe.

The rights of a member or manager to obtain information as provided in this section may be restricted in the initial operating agreement or in any subsequent amendment approved or adopted by all of the members or in compliance with any applicable requirements of the operating agreement.The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to limit the ability to impose restrictions on the rights of a member or manager to obtain information by any other means permitted under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.